Utah statutes.
58-17b-306.   Qualifications for licensure as a pharmacy.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure under this section, except for those applying for a class D license, shall:

(a)  submit a written application in the form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  satisfy the division that the applicant, and each owner, officer, or manager of the applicant have not engaged in any act, practice, or omission, which when considered with the duties and responsibilities of a licensee under this section indicates there is cause to believe that issuing a license to the applicant is inconsistent with the interest of the public's health, safety, or welfare;

(d)  demonstrate the licensee's operations will be in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws relating to the type of activity engaged in by the licensee, including regulations of the Federal Drug Enforcement Administration and Food and Drug Administration;

(e)  maintain operating standards established by division rule made in collaboration with the board; and

(f)  acknowledge the division's authority to inspect the licensee's business premises pursuant to Section 58-17b-103.

(2)  Each applicant applying for a class D license shall:

(a)  submit a written application in the form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  present to the division verification of licensure in the state where physically located and verification that such license is in good standing;

(d)  provide a statement of the scope of pharmacy services that will be provided and a detailed description of the protocol as described by rule by which pharmacy care will be provided, including any collaborative practice arrangements with other health care practitioners;

(e)  sign an affidavit attesting that any healthcare practitioners employed by the applicant and physically located in Utah have the appropriate license issued by the division and in good standing; and

(f)  sign an affidavit attesting that the applicant will abide by the pharmacy laws and regulations of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is located.

(3)  Each license issued under this section shall be issued for a single, specific address, and is not transferable or assignable.

